Hawaii statutes.
§326-5 Appropriations, how spent. All
moneys at any time appropriated for the upkeep, support, maintenance, and
conduct of any hospital, facility, or place for persons affected with Hansen's
disease, shall be expended under the supervision and authority and by the order
of the department of health, upon vouchers signed by the director of health. [L
1931, c 139, §4; am L 1933, c 118, §1; RL 1935, §1144; RL 1945, §2406; am L
1949, c 53, §3; am imp L 1949, c 109; RL 1955, §50-7; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§19; HRS §326-5; am L 1969, c 152, §1; am L 1981, c 185, §6; am L 1985, c 250,
§5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next